Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,173
Grade crossings; certain carriers; required to stop; exceptions.

(1) The driver of any vehicle which is required to be placarded pursuant to section 75-364, before crossing at a grade any track of a railroad on streets and highways, shall stop such vehicle not more than fifty feet nor less than fifteen feet from the nearest rail or railroad and while stopped shall listen and look in both directions along the track for an approaching railroad train or on-track equipment. The driver shall not proceed until precaution has been taken to ascertain that the course is clear.

(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply:

(a) When a peace officer or a flagperson directs traffic to proceed;

(b) At an abandoned or exempted grade crossing which is clearly marked as such by or with the consent of competent authority when such markings can be read from the driver's position; or

(c) At railroad tracks used exclusively for industrial switching purposes within a business district.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to exempt the driver of any vehicle from compliance with the other requirements contained in the Nebraska Rules of the Road.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 58;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-658;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 269;

Laws 1998, LB 1056, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB81, § 6.